Utah statutes.
35A-8-301.   Legislative intent -- Purpose and policy.

(1)  It is the intent of the Legislature to make available funds received by the state from federal mineral lease revenues under Section 59-21-2, bonus payments on federal oil shale lease tracts U-A and U-B, and all other bonus payments on federal mineral leases to be used for the alleviation of social, economic, and public finance impacts resulting from the development of natural resources in this state, subject to the limitations provided for in Section 35 of the Mineral Leasing Act of 1920 (41 Stat. 450, 30 U.S.C. Sec. 191).

(2)  The purpose of this part is to maximize the long term benefit of funds derived from these lease revenues and bonus payments by fostering funding mechanisms which will, consistent with sound financial practices, result in the greatest use of financial resources for the greatest number of citizens of this state, with priority given to those communities designated as impacted by the development of natural resources covered by the Mineral Leasing Act.

(3)  The policy of this state is to promote cooperation and coordination between the state and its agencies and political subdivisions with individuals, firms, and business organizations engaged in the development of the natural resources of this state.  The purpose of such efforts include private sector participation, financial and otherwise, in the alleviation of impacts associated with resources development activities.

